Hawaii statutes.
§184-3 Powers of department. The
department of land and natural resources, in addition to the other powers
herein granted, for the purpose of performing its duties and functions may:

(1) Acquire land in the name of the State or any
estate, right, or interest therein or appurtenance thereto, by agreement, gift,
devise, lease, or condemnation in accordance with chapter 101, and the
department of accounting and general services shall assist the department of
land and natural resources therein, at its request, and assign thereto state
officers and employees under its supervision for the making of surveys,
abstracts, and otherwise as may be of assistance, without reimbursement for
such services;

(2) Receive gifts, bequests, or contributions of
money or other property;

(3) Accept such condition imposed upon any gift or
devise of land, money, or other property as may be acceptable to the department
and not inconsistent with the proper discharge of its duties and functions;

(4) Accept transfers and conveyances of rights and
titles vested in the United States government to land and buildings within this
State, or lease the same under such conditions as the government of the United
States may impose;

(5) Make expenditures from funds available for the
care, supervision, improvement, development, and protection of the state park
system;

(6) Construct and operate suitable public services,
facilities, and conveniences on any land under its jurisdiction and control,
with power to charge and collect reasonable fees for the use of the same, or in
its discretion, enter into contracts, leases, or licenses for the construction
or operation of any services, facilities, or conveniences on any land under its
jurisdiction and control upon such terms and conditions as are deemed by it to
be in the public interest, including in the area covered by the contract,
lease, or license the amount of land deemed by it to be reasonably necessary to
the success of the undertaking;

(7) Acquire, by condemnation or otherwise, rights
appurtenant to abutting property for light, air, and access, whenever necessary
or proper for the establishment, development, improvement, or extension of any
parkway;

(8) Cooperate with counties, and other political
subdivisions and agencies of the State, and with the states and with the United
States government in matters relating to planning, establishing, developing,
improving, or maintaining any park, parkway, or recreational area;

(9) Accept from a county, park lands which may
include related improvements, personnel, equipment, and functions; and

(10) Transfer to a county, park lands which may
include related improvements, personnel, equipment, and functions. [L 1949, c
185, pt of §1; RL 1955, §19-34; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§12, 21; am L 1961, c
132, §2; HRS §184-3; am L 1987, c 335, §2]

Cross References

Exchange of park
property with county, see §46-65.5.

State beach park
lifeguard services, see §46-12.5.

Statewide trail and
access system, see chapter 198D.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next